Washington statutes.
RCW 24.06.510

Action by members or directors without a meeting.

Any action required by this chapter to be taken at a meeting of the members, shareholders or directors of a corporation, or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the members, shareholders or directors, may be taken without a meeting, if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is signed by all of the members and shareholders entitled to vote thereon, or by all of the directors, as the case may be, unless the articles or bylaws provide to the contrary.

Such consent shall have the same force and effect as a unanimous vote, and may be stated as such in any articles or document filed with the secretary of state.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 120 s 102.]